Washington statutes.
RCW 35.56.140

Local improvement bonds—Guaranties.

The city may guarantee the payment of the whole or any part of the bonds issued against a local improvement district, but the guaranties on the part of the city shall be made only by ordinance passed by the vote of not less than two-thirds of the councilmembers and the approval of the mayor, or three commissioners in case the governing body consist of three commissioners, or four where such city is governed by five commissioners.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2096; 1965 c 7 s 35.56.140. Prior: 1913 c 16 s 10, part; RRS s 9458, part.]